South Dakota, session 2026, HB1190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
There is established the South Dakota-tribal consultation commission to foster
continuing cooperation and collaboration between the state and the nine federally
recognized Indian tribes, in a way that recognizes and respects tribal sovereignty and self-
governance, and allows representatives of the tribes to provide input on state affairs.
The commission shall consist of:
(1) The Governor or a cabinet-level designee;
(2) The secretary of the Department of Tribal Relations, or the secretary's designee;
(3) One representative from each federally recognized Indian tribe, appointed by the
governing body of the tribe;
(4) One member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
House of Representatives; and
(5) One member of the Senate; appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate.
Any vacancy on the commission must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment. At its initial meeting, the commission shall elect a chair and vice chair from
among its members. The Department of Tribal Relations shall provide administrative
support to the commission.
The commission shall meet at least once every three months. At each meeting, the
Governor or the Governor's designee shall provide a report detailing any initiative that the
state has undertaken since the previous meeting or any relevant update on an initiative
that had been previously reported to the commission, and receive feedback from the
commission on any impact the initiative might have on the tribes.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1190B 2 1190
The commission shall submit an annual report of its find(ings and
recommendations to the Governor on or before December first of each year.
There is established the South Dakota-Tribal Consultation Commission to:
(1) Foster continuing cooperation, coordination, and collaboration between the state
and the nine federally recognized Indian tribes;
(2) Provide a forum for government-to-government consultation between the state
and each Indian tribe;
(3) Strengthen the government-to-government relationship between the state and
each Indian tribe;
(4) Recognize and respect tribal sovereignty and self-governance;
(5) Provide a structured forum for meaningful, timely, and substantive consultation on
matters of shared concern;
(6) Facilitate coordination and cooperation in the development of state policies,
initiatives, and programs;
(7) Review state initiatives that may have a substantial effect on tribal governments,
citizens, lands, institutions, or other interests;
(8) Provide recommendations to promote collaboration, reduce jurisdictional conflict,
and strengthen intergovernmental relationships;
(9) Support alignment of state and tribal priorities in areas of mutual concern; and
(10) Develop and advance proposed legislation for consideration by the Legislature,
which may strengthen state-tribal relations and provide mutual benefit to the state
and each Indian tribe.
Nothing in this Act may be construed as a waiver of tribal sovereignty, jurisdiction,
treaty rights, or self-governance authority. Nothing in this Act may be construed to be a
delegation of tribal powers to the state.
The commission may not exercise any regulatory authority over tribal
governments, lands, or institutions, and functions only as a forum for coordination and
cooperation.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
The South Dakota-Tribal Consultation Commission consists of:
(1) The Governor or a cabinet-level designee;
(2) The secretary of the Department of Tribal Relations, or the secretary's designee;
(3) One representative from each federally recognized Indian tribe, appointed by the
governing body of the tribe;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1190B 3 1190
(4) One member of the State-Tribal Relations Committee from the House of
Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives; and
(5) One member from the State-Tribal Relations Committee from the Senate;
appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate.
Any vacancy on the commission must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment. At its initial meeting, the commission shall elect a chair and vice chair from
among its members. The Department of Tribal Relations shall provide administrative
support to the commission.
The commission shall meet at least once every three months.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
At each meeting of the South Dakota-Tribal Consultation Commission, the
Governor or the Governor’s designee shall provide a report detailing any initiative that the
state has undertaken since the previous meeting, or any relevant update on an initiative
previously reported to the commission and shall receive feedback from the commission
regarding any potential impacts on tribal interests.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
The South Dakota-Tribal Consultation Commission shall submit an annual report of
its findings and recommendations to the Governor on or before December first of each
year.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
The South Dakota-Tribal Consultation Commission may issue findings, guidance,
and recommendations, but does not possess binding decision-making authority over any
state agency, political subdivision, or tribal government.
Nothing in this Act may be construed to require any state agency, political
subdivision, or tribal government to adopt, implement, or enforce any of the findings,
guidance, or recommendations issued by the commission.
The commission may not:
(1) Promulgate rules;
(2) Issue directives;
(3) Impose standards;
(4) Require compliance;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1190B 4 1190
(5) Exercise enforcement authority;
(6) Adjudicate disputes; or
(7) Resolve jurisdictional conflicts; or compel participation by any state or tribal entity.
All actions, findings, and recommendations of the commission must be developed
through consensus-based collaboration, reflecting the government-to-government
relationship between the state and each Indian tribe. The commission may serve only as
an advisory instrument to support cooperation, coordination, and collaboration.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.